Louisiana, session 2026, SB523.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:572.4(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§572.4. Board of Pardons; rules, regulations, and procedures; notice; restrictions on
applications; time periods for additional review
* * *
D.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
Subsection, any applicant who has been sentenced to life imprisonment shall not be
eligible to apply to the board for a pardon or commutation of sentence for a period
of fifteen years after being sentenced by the trial court, except that periods of time
prior to the imposition of the sentence in which the defendant was in actual custody
for the offense for which the defendant was sentenced to life imprisonment shall be
included in computing the fifteen-year period.
(2) Any Except as provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection, any
applicant who has been sentenced to life imprisonment for an offense that is either
a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B) or a sex offense as defined in R.S.
15:541 shall not be eligible to apply to the board for a pardon or commutation of
sentence for a period of twenty-five years after being sentenced by the trial court,
except that periods of time prior to the imposition of the sentence in which the
defendant was in actual custody for the offense for which the defendant was
sentenced to life imprisonment shall be included in computing the twenty-five-year
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 523 ENROLLED
period. A person who is serving a life sentence resulting from a commutation of a
sentence of death shall not thereafter be eligible to apply for commutation of
sentence to a specific number of years.
(3)(a) Except as provided in Subparagraphs (b) and (c) of this
Paragraph, an applicant who was a documented victim of domestic abuse,
human trafficking, trafficking of children for sexual purposes, or sexual assault
at the time of the commission of the offense for which he was convicted is
eligible to apply to the board for a pardon or commutation of sentence.
(b) Except as provided in Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph, an
applicant who has been sentenced to life imprisonment pursuant to Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection or for a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B) shall
not be eligible to apply to the board for a pardon or commutation of sentence
for a period of five years after being sentenced by the trial court.
(c) An applicant shall not be eligible to apply to the board for a pardon
or commutation of sentence under Subparagraph (a) or (b) of this Paragraph
for any of the following:
(i) A conviction that would require the person to register as a sex
offender.
(ii) A conviction resulting in a sentence of death.
(iii) A conviction for a violation of R.S. 14:128.1 or 128.2.
(4) If the application is denied, the applicant shall be notified in writing of the
reason for the denial and thereafter may file a new application to the board no earlier
than five years from the date of action by the board. Any subsequent applications
shall not be filed earlier than five years after the immediately preceding action taken
by the board.
(4)(5) The provisions of this Subsection shall not apply when the board
determines that new and material evidence that, notwithstanding the exercise of
reasonable diligence by the applicant, was not discovered before or during his trial,
is available, and if it had been introduced at the trial, it would probably have changed
the verdict or judgment of guilty.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 523 ENROLLED
* * *
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 894.1(B)(33) is hereby amended and
reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 894.1(B)(34) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 894.1. Sentencing guidelines; generally
* * *
B. The following grounds, while not controlling the discretion of the court,
shall be accorded weight in its determination of suspension of sentence or probation:
* * *
(33) The defendant is a victim of domestic abuse, human trafficking,
trafficking of children for sexual purposes, or sexual assault and there was a
rational, causal, and temporally proximate connection between the defendant's
victimization and the instant offense.
(34) Any other relevant mitigating circumstance.
* * *
Section 3. The legislature directs the Board of Pardons to review its existing rules,
regulations, and procedures for consideration of clemency applications and adopt any rules,
regulations, or procedures necessary to implement this Act.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.